District of Columbia statutes.
29-1122

Distributions prohibited; compensation and other permitted payments.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, an unincorporated nonprofit association shall not pay dividends or make distributions to a member or manager.

(b)

An unincorporated nonprofit association may:

(1)

Pay reasonable compensation or reimburse reasonable expenses to a member or manager for services rendered;

(2)

Confer benefits on a member or manager in conformity with its nonprofit purposes;

(3)

Repurchase a membership and repay a capital contributions made by a member to the extent authorized by its governing principles; or

(4)

Make distributions of property to members upon winding up and termination to the extent permitted by § 29-1125.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 26 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).